Hawaii statutes.
§11-54 Status pending appeal. In case
of an appeal from a decision of any board of registration the name of the
person shall be placed or remain upon the register pending the decision of the
appellate courts concerning the same. If the person so registered votes at any
election before the appeal is decided and acted upon, the ballot of such voter
shall be handled in accordance with section 11-25(c). [L 1970, c 26, pt of §2;
am L 2004, c 202, §4; am L 2006, c 94, §1; am L 2010, c 109, §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next